Hawaii, session 2026, SB2477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 6E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§6E-    Maunalua island markers.  (a) The department shall place historical markers on the landform on which the Hawaii Kai Towne Center is sited to recognize the landform as Maunalua island." SECTION 2. (a)  Any costs and expenditures necessary for the purposes of section 6E-   shall be paid by the state foundation on culture and the arts. (b) The department shall consult with the state foundation on culture and the arts to standardize the design of the historical markers placed pursuant to section 6E-  , to include but not be limited to a historical narrative explanation of Maunalua island. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.